Utah statutes.
19-1-302.   Violation of laws and orders unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person:

(1)  to violate the provisions of the laws of this title or the terms of any order or rule issued under it; or

(2)  to fail to remove or abate from private property under the person's control at his own expense within 48 hours, or such other reasonable time as the department determines, after being ordered to do so, any nuisance, source of filth, or other sanitation violation.

